Florida, session 2026, HB427.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (7) of section 626.854, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
626.854 "Public adjuster" defined; prohibitions.—The
Legislature finds that it is necessary for the protection of the
public to regulate public insurance adjusters and to prevent the
unauthorized practice of law.
(7)(a) An insured or a claimant may cancel a public
adjuster's contract to adjust a claim without penalty or
obligation within 10 days after the date on which the contract
is executed. If the contract was entered into based on events
that are the subject of a declaration of a state of emergency by
the Governor, an insured or a claimant may cancel the public
adjuster's contract to adjust a claim without penalty or
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb427-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 427 2026
obligation within 30 days after the date of loss or 10 days
after the date on which the contract is executed, whichever is
longer. The public adjuster's contract must contain the
following language in minimum 18-point bold type immediately
before the space reserved in the contract for the signature of
the insured or claimant:

"You, the insured, may cancel this contract for any
reason without penalty or obligation to you within 10
days after the date of this contract. If this contract
was entered into based on events that are the subject
of a declaration of a state of emergency by the
Governor, you may cancel this contract for any reason
without penalty or obligation to you within 30 days
after the date of loss or 10 days after the date on
which the contract is executed, whichever is longer.
You may also cancel the contract without penalty or
obligation to you if I, as your public adjuster, fail
to provide you and your insurer a copy of a written
estimate within 60 days of the execution of the
contract, unless the failure to provide the estimate
within 60 days is caused by factors beyond my control,
in accordance with s. 627.70131(5)(a)2., Florida
Statutes. The 60-day cancellation period for failure
to provide a written estimate shall cease on the date
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb427-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 427 2026
I have provided you with the written estimate."

The notice of cancellation must shall be provided to ...(name of
public adjuster)..., submitted in writing and sent by certified
mail, return receipt requested, or other form of mailing that
provides proof thereof, at the address specified in the
contract.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
an insured who is a vulnerable adult or who lacks capacity to
consent, as those terms are defined in s. 415.102, or the legal
representative of such insured persons, may rescind a contract
for public adjuster services to adjust a claim at any time
without penalty or further obligation.
Section 2. Section 626.8698, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
626.8698 Disciplinary guidelines for public adjusters and
public adjuster apprentices.—The department may deny, suspend,
or revoke the license of a public adjuster or public adjuster
apprentice, and administer a fine not to exceed $5,000 per act,
for any of the following acts:
(1) Violating any provision of this chapter or a rule or
order of the department.;
(2) Receiving payment or anything of value as a result of
an unfair or deceptive practice.;
(3) Receiving or accepting any fee, kickback, or other
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb427-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 427 2026
thing of value pursuant to any agreement or understanding, oral
or otherwise; entering into a split-fee arrangement with another
person who is not a public adjuster; or being otherwise paid or
accepting payment for services that have not been performed.;
(4) Violating s. 316.066 or s. 817.234.;
(5) Soliciting or otherwise taking advantage of a person
who is a vulnerable adult, as defined is s. 415.102, or who is
emotional, or otherwise upset as the result of a trauma,
accident, or other similar occurrence.; or
(6) Violating any ethical rule of the department.
Section 3. Subsection (4) of section 626.8796, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
626.8796 Public adjuster contracts; disclosure statement;
fraud statement.—
(4)(a) The insured may rescind the contract for public
adjuster services if the public adjuster has not submitted a
written estimate to the insurer within 60 days after executing
the contract, unless the failure to provide the written estimate
within 60 days is caused by factors beyond the public adjuster's
control.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
an insured who is a vulnerable adult or who lacks capacity to
consent, as those terms are defined in s. 415.102, or the legal
representative of such insured persons, may rescind a contract
100 for public adjuster services at any time without penalty or
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb427-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 427 2026
101 further obligation.
102 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb427-00